Utah statutes.
63F-1-301.   Cost based services -- Fees -- Rate committee.

(1)  The chief information officer shall:

(a)  at the lowest practical cost, manage the delivery of efficient and cost-effective information technology and telecommunication services for:

(i)  all executive branch agencies; and

(ii)  entities that subscribe to the services in accordance with Section 63F-1-303; and

(b)  provide priority service to public safety agencies.

(2) (a)  In accordance with this Subsection (2), the chief information officer shall prescribe a schedule of fees for all services rendered by the department to:

(i)  an executive branch entity; or

(ii)  an entity that subscribes to services rendered by the department in accordance with Section 63F-1-303.

(b)  Each fee included in the schedule of fees required by Subsection (2)(a):

(i)  shall be equitable;

(ii)  should be based upon a zero based, full cost accounting of activities necessary to provide each service for which a fee is established; and

(iii)  for each service multiplied by the projected consumption of the service recovers no more or less than the full cost of each service.

(c)  Before charging a fee for its services to an executive branch agency or to a subscriber of services other than an executive branch agency, the chief information officer shall:

(i)  submit the proposed rates, fees, and cost analysis to the Rate Committee established in Section 63F-1-302; and

(ii)  obtain the approval of the Legislature as required by Section 63J-1-410.

(d)  The chief information officer shall conduct a market analysis by July 1, 2006, and periodically thereafter, of proposed rates and fees, which analysis shall include a comparison of the department's rates with the fees of other public or private sector providers where comparable services and rates are reasonably available.

